Illinois, session 104th, SB691.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Pension Funds Continuing 5Appropriation Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 15/1)7    Sec. 1. Appropriations from State Pensions Fund. 8    (a) For the the purpose of making up any deficiency in the 9appropriations to the designated retirement systems that are 10required to be made under Section 8.12 of the State Finance 11Act, there is hereby appropriated, on a continuing annual 12basis in each fiscal year, from the State Pensions Fund to each 13designated retirement system, the amount, if any, by which the 14total appropriation to that system from the State Pensions 15Fund for that fiscal year is less than the amount required to 16be appropriated to that retirement system under Section 8.12 17of the State Finance Act.18    The annual appropriation under this Section to each 19designated retirement system shall take effect on July 1 for 20the State fiscal year beginning on that date.21    The amount of any continuing appropriation used by a 22retirement system under this Section for a given fiscal year 23shall be charged against the unexpended amount of any   SB0691- 2 -LRB104 06999 RPS 17036 b1appropriation to that retirement system for that fiscal year 2under Section 8.12 of the State Finance Act that subsequently 3becomes available, subject to Section 8.3 of the State Finance 4Act.5    "Designated retirement systems" means the State Employees' 6Retirement System of Illinois, the Teachers' Retirement System 7of the State of Illinois, the State Universities Retirement 8System, the Judges Retirement System of Illinois, and the 9General Assembly Retirement System.10    The appropriations made in this Section are appropriated 11to the designated retirement systems for the funding of the 12unfunded liabilities of the designated retirement systems and 13are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any State contributions 14required under the Illinois Pension Code.15    (b) For State fiscal year 2011 only, a continuing 16appropriation is provided to the State Universities' 17Retirement System that shall not exceed the amount certified 18by the System on or before December 31, 2009; however, the 19continuing appropriation shall not reduce the amount in the 20State Pensions Fund below $5,000,000. 21(Source: P.A. 95-950, eff. 8-29-08; 96-959, eff. 7-1-10.)